Massachusetts, session 194th, H3390.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 26 of chapter 9 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
out the words “11 persons” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 12 persons.
SECTION 2. Said section 9 is further amended by inserting the following after
“Antiquities”:- one from a list of two nominees, each nominee submitted by one of the two
federally recognized tribes in the Commonwealth.
of 1